nl: Genre: Actie en avontuur; Animatie; Anime; Kunsten; Biografie; Bedrijfsleven; Kinderen; Strips en beeldromans; Misdaad en mysterie; Ontwerp; Documentaire; Drama; Onderwijs; Familie; Droomwereld; Fashion & Beauty; Financiën; Eten en koken; Spelshow; Gamen; Gezondheid en fitness; Historische roman; Geschiedenis; Hobby's en interesses; Horror; Humor en komedie; Literatuur; Marketing; Mentale gezondheid; Films en tv; Muziek; Nieuws en politiek; Ouderschap; Kostuumdrama; Filosofie; Reality-tv; Relaties; Religie en spiritualiteit; Roman; Sci-Fi; Zelfhulp en persoonlijke ontwikkeling; Maatschappij en cultuur; Sporten; Bovennatuurlijk; Spanning; Talkshow; Technologie; Thriller en spanning; Reizen; Oorlog; Western; Jongvolwassene; Andere
sv: Genre: Action och äventyr; Animation; Anime; Konst; Biografi; Företag; Barn; Serier och grafiska romaner; Brott och mystik; Design; Dokumentär; Drama; Utbildning; Familj; Fantasy; Mode och skönhet; Finans; Mat & matlagning; Spelshow; Spelande; Hälsa och fitness; Historiska romaner; Historia; Hobbys och intressen; Skräck; Humor och komedi; Litteratur; Marknadsföring; Mental hälsa; Filmer och TV; Musik; Nyheter och politik; Föräldraskap; Kostymdrama; Filosofi; Dokusåpa; Relationer; Religion och andlighet; Romantik; Sci-Fi; Självhjälp och personlig utveckling; Samhälle och kultur; Sporter; Övernaturlig; Spänning; Pratshow; Teknologi; Thriller och spänning; Resor; Krig; Western; Ung vuxen; Annat
ru: Жанр: Боевики и приключения; Анимация; Аниме; Искусство; Биография; Бизнес; Дети; Комиксы и иллюстрированные романы; Криминал и детектив; Дизайн; Документальный фильм; Драма; Образование; Семья; Фантастика; Мода и красота; Финансы; Еда и кулинария; Игровое шоу; Игра; Здоровье и фитнес; Историческая фантастика; История; Хобби и интересы; Ужасы; Юмор и комедия; Литература; Маркетинг; Психическое здоровье; Фильмы и ТВ; Музыка; Новости и политика; Воспитание детей; Историческая драма; Философия; Реалити-шоу; Отношения; Религия и духовность; Романтика; Научная фантастика; Самопомощь и личностное развитие; Общество и культура; Спорт; Сверхъестественное; Саспенс; Ток-шоу; Технологии; Триллер и саспенс; Путешествие; Война; Вестерн; Молодежь; Другой
sl-SI: Žanr: Akcija in pustolovščina; Animacija; Anime; Umetnost; Biografija; Posel; Za otroke; Stripi in grafični romani; Zločin in skrivnost; Oblikovanje; Dokumentarni film; Drama; Izobraževanje; Družinska; Fantazija; Moda in lepota; Finance; Hrana in kuhanje; Tekmovalna oddaja; Igričarstvo; Zdravje in fitnes; Zgodovinska fikcija; Zgodovina; Hobiji in interesi; Groza; Humor in komedija; Literatura; Trženje; Mentalno zdravje; Filmi in TV; Glasba; Novice in politika; Starševstvo; Obdobna drama; Filozofija; Resničnostna televizija; Odnosi; Religija in duhovnost; Romantika; Znanstvena fantastika; Samopomoč in osebni razvoj; Družba in kultura; Šport; Nadnaravno; Napetost; Pogovorna oddaja; Tehnologija; Triler in napetost; Potovanje; Vojna; Western; Za mlade odrasle; Drugo
en: Genre: Action & adventure; Animation; Anime; Arts; Biography; Business; Children; Comics & graphic novels; Crime & mystery; Design; Documentary; Drama; Education; Family; Fantasy; Fashion & beauty; Finance; Food & cooking; Game show; Gaming; Health & fitness; Historical fiction; History; Hobbies & interests; Horror; Humor & comedy; Literature; Marketing; Mental health; Movies & TV; Music; News & politics; Parenting; Period drama; Philosophy; Reality TV; Relationships; Religion & spirituality; Romance; Sci-fi; Self-help & personal development; Society & culture; Sports; Supernatural; Suspense; Talk show; Technology; Thriller & suspense; Travel; War; Western; Young adult; Other
ro-RO: Gen: Acțiune și aventură; Animație; Anime; Arte; Biografie; Afaceri; Copii; Benzi desenate și romane grafice; Crimă și mister; Design; Documentar; Dramă; Educație; Familie; Fantezie; Modă și frumusețe; Finanțe; Mâncare și gătit; Emisiune de jocuri; Jocuri; Sănătate și fitness; Ficțiune istorică; Istorie; Hobby-uri și interese; Groază; Umor și comedie; Literatură; Marketing; Sănătate mintală; Filme și televiziune; Muzică; Știri și politică; Părinți; Dramă de epocă; Filozofie; Reality TV; Relații; Religie și spiritualitate; Romantism; Sci-fi; Auto-terapie și dezvoltare personală; Societate și cultură; Sport; Supranatural; Suspans; Talk show; Tehnologie; Thriller și suspans; Călătorii; Război; Western; Adulți tineri; Altele
el: Είδος: Δράση και περιπέτεια; Κινούμενα σχέδια; Anime; Τέχνες; Βιογραφία; Επιχειρήσεις; Παιδιά; Κόμικς και graphic novels; Έγκλημα και μυστήριο; Σχέδιο; Ντοκυμαντέρ; Δράμα; Εκπαίδευση; Οικογενειακό; Φαντασία; Μόδα και ομορφιά; Οικονομικά; Φαγητό και μαγείρεμα; Τηλεπαιχνίδι; Βιντεοπαιχνίδια; Υγεία και φυσική κατάσταση; Ιστορική μυθοπλασία; Ιστορία; Χόμπι και ενδιαφέροντα; Τρόμου; Χιούμορ και κωμωδία; Λογοτεχνία; Μάρκετινγκ; Ψυχική υγεία; Ταινίες και τηλεόραση; Μουσική; Νέα και πολιτική; Γονεϊκότητα; Δράμα εποχής; Φιλοσοφία; Reality TV; Σχέσεις; Θρησκεία και πνευματικότητα; Ρομάντζο; Επιστημονική φαντασία; Αυτοβοήθεια και προσωπική ανάπτυξη; Κοινωνία και πολιτισμός; Αθλητισμός; Υπερφυσικό; Αγωνία; Τοκ σόου; Τεχνολογία; Θρίλερ και σασπένς; Ταξίδι; Πόλεμος; Γουέστερν; Για νέους ενήλικες; Άλλο
da: Genre: Action og eventyr; Animation; Anime; Kunst; Biografi; Forretning; Børn; Tegneserier og grafiske romaner; Krimi og mystik; Design; Dokumentar; Drama; Uddannelse; Familie; Fantasy; Mode og skønhed; Finans; Mad og madlavning; TV-quiz; Gaming; Sundhed og fitness; Historisk fiktion; Historie; Hobbyer og interesser; Gyser; Humor og komedie; Litteratur; Marketing; Mentalt helbred; Film & TV; Musik; Nyheder og politik; Forældreskab; Periodisk drama; Filosofi; Reality-tv; Forhold; Religion og spiritualitet; Romantik; Sci-Fi; Selvhjælp og personlig udvikling; Samfund og kultur; Sport; Overnaturligt; Spænding; Talkshow; Teknologi; Thriller og spænding; Rejse; Krig; Western; Unge voksne; Andet
fr: Genre: Action et aventure; Animation; Anime; Arts; Biographie; Entreprise; Enfants; Bandes dessinées et romans graphiques; Crime et mystère; Design; Documentaire; Drame; Éducation; Famille; Fantaisie; Mode et beauté; Finance; Alimentation et cuisine; Jeu télévisé; Jeux; Santé et forme physique; Fiction historique; Histoire; Loisirs et intérêts; Horreur; Humour et comédie; Littérature; Marketing; Santé mentale; Films et télévision; Musique; Actualités et politique; Parentalité; Série historique; Philosophie; Télé-réalité; Relations; Religion et spiritualité; Romance; Science-fiction; Développement personnel; Société et culture; Sports; Surnaturel; Suspense; Talk-show; Technologie; Thriller et suspense; Voyage; Guerre; Western; Jeune adulte; Autre
vi: Thể loại: Hành động và phiêu lưu; Hoạt hình; Anime; Nghệ thuật; Tiểu sử; Điện thoại bàn; Trẻ em; Truyện tranh và tiểu thuyết hình ảnh; Tội ác và bí ẩn; Thiết kế; Phim tài liệu; Chính kịch; Giáo dục; Gia đình; Kỳ ảo; Thời trang và làm đẹp; Tài chính; Đồ ăn và nấu nướng; Chương trình trò chơi; Chơi game; Sức khỏe và thể hình; Tiểu thuyết hư cấu lịch sử; Lịch sử; Sở thích và mối quan tâm; Kinh dị; Hài hước và hài kịch; Văn học; Tiếp thị; Sức khỏe tinh thần; Phim & Truyền hình; Âm nhạc; Tin tức và chính trị; Nuôi dạy con cái; Phim cổ trang; Triết học; Truyền hình thực tế; Mối quan hệ; Tôn giáo và tâm linh; Lãng mạn; Khoa học viễn tưởng; Tự lực và phát triển cá nhân; Xã hội và văn hóa; Thể thao; Siêu nhiên; Hồi hộp; Tọa đàm; Công nghệ; Giật gân và hồi hộp; Du lịch; Chiến tranh; Miền Tây; Thanh niên; Khác
es: Género: Acción y aventura; Animación; Animé; Artes; Biografía; Negocio; Niños; Cómics y novelas gráficas; Crimen y misterio; Diseño; Documental; Drama; Educación; Familia; Fantasía; Moda y belleza; Finanzas; Comida y cocina; Programa de juegos; Juegos; Salud y estado físico; Ficción histórica; Historia; Pasatiempos e intereses; Terror; Humor y comedia; Literatura; Márketing; Salud mental; Películas y televisión; Música; Noticias y política; Crianza; Drama de época; Filosofía; Telerrealidad; Relaciones; Religión y espiritualidad; Romance; Ciencia ficción; Autoayuda y desarrollo personal; Sociedad y cultura; Deportes; Supernatural; Suspenso; Programa de entrevistas; Tecnología; Suspenso; Viajar; Guerra; Occidental; Adulto joven; Otros
ja: ジャンル: アクション&アドベンチャー; アニメーション; アニメ; アート; バイオグラフィー; ビジネス; 子供; コミック&グラフィックノベル; 犯罪&ミステリー; デザイン; ドキュメンタリー; ドラマ; 教育; ファミリー; ファンタジー; ファッション&ビューティー; 金融; 食べ物・料理; ゲームショー; ゲーム; ヘルス&フィットネス; ヒストリカル・フィクション; 歴史; 趣味; ホラー; ユーモア&コメディ; 文学; マーケティング; メンタルヘルス; 映画&テレビ; 音楽; ニュース&政治; 子育て; 時代劇; 哲学; リアリティ番組; 人間関係; 宗教とスピリチュアリティ; ロマンス; SF; 自己啓発; 社会と文化; スポーツ; スーパーナチュラル; サスペンス; トークショー; テクノロジー; スリラー&サスペンス; 旅行; 戦争; 西洋; ヤングアダルト; その他
zh-CN: 类型: 动作冒险; 动画片; 动漫; 艺术; 传记; 商业; 儿童; 漫画和绘画小说; 犯罪与悬疑; 设计; 纪录片; 戏剧; 教育; 家庭; 幻想; 时尚与美容; 金融; 食物与烹饪; 游戏节目; 游戏; 健康与健身; 历史人物; 历史; 兴趣爱好; 恐怖; 幽默与喜剧; 文学; 营销; 心理健康; 电影和电视; 音乐; 新闻与政治; 育儿; 历史剧; 哲学; 电视真人秀; 人际关系; 宗教与灵性; 浪漫; 科幻风; 自助与个人发展; 社会与文化; 体育; 超自然; 悬念; 脱口秀; 科技; 惊悚与悬疑; 旅行; 战争; 西方; 青少年; 其他
pt-PT: Género: Ação e aventura; Animação; Animé; Artes; Biografia; Empresarial; Crianças; Bandas desenhadas e novelas gráficas; Crime e mistério; Design; Documentário; Drama; Educação; Família; Fantasia; Moda e beleza; Finanças; Alimentação e culinária; Programa de jogos; Jogar; Saúde e fitness; Ficção histórica; História; Passatempos e interesses; Terror; Humor e comédia; Literatura; Marketing; Saúde mental; Filmes e TV; Música; Notícias e política; Parentalidade; Drama de época; Filosofia; Reality TV; Relacionamentos; Religião e espiritualidade; Romance; Ficção científica; Autoajuda e desenvolvimento pessoal; Sociedade e cultura; Desportivo; Sobrenatural; Suspense; Talk show; Tecnologia; Thriller e suspense; Viagens; Guerra; Western; Jovem adulto; Outro
pl: Gatunek: Akcja i przygody; Animacja; Anime; Sztuka; Biografia; Działalność; Dzieci; Komiksy i powieści graficzne; Kryminał i tajemnica; Projekt; Dokumentalny; Dramat; Edukacja; Rodzina; Fantasy; Moda i uroda; Finanse; Jedzenie i gotowanie; Teleturniej; Hazard; Zdrowie i sprawność fizyczna; Fikcja historyczna; Historia; Hobby i zainteresowania; Horror; Humor i komedia; Literatura; Marketing; Zdrowie psychiczne; Filmy i telewizja; Muzyczne; Wiadomości i polityka; Rodzicielstwo; Dramat historyczny; Filozofia; Reality TV; Relacje; Religia i duchowość; Romans; Sci-Fi; Samopomoc i rozwój osobisty; Społeczeństwo i kultura; Sport; Zjawiska nadprzyrodzone; Suspens; Talk-show; Technologia; Thriller i suspens; Podróże; Wojna; Western; Młody dorosły; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Žáner: Akcia a dobrodružstvo; Animácia; Anime; Umenie; Životopis; Podnikanie; Deti; Komiksy a grafické romány; Krimi a mysteriózne; Dizajn; Dokumentárny; Dráma; Vzdelanie; Rodina; Fantasy; Móda a krása; Financie; Jedlo a varenie; Herné show; Hranie; Zdravie a fitnes; Historická beletria; História; Záľuby a koníčky; Horor; Humor a komédia; Literatúra; Marketing; Duševné zdravie; Filmy a televízia; Hudba; Správy a politika; Rodičovstvo; Dobová dráma; Filozofia; Reality TV; Vzťahy; Náboženstvo a spiritualita; Romantika; Sci-fi; Svojpomoc a osobný rozvoj; Spoločnosť a kultúra; Šport; Nadprirodzené; Napínavé; Talk show; Technológie; Thriller a napätie; Cestovanie; Vojna; Western; Mladý dospelý; Iné
de: Genre: Action & Abenteuer; Animation; Anime; Kunst; Biografie; Geschäft; Kinder; Comics und Graphic Novels; Crime & Mystery; Design; Dokumentarfilm; Drama; Bildung; Familie; Fantasy; Fashion & Beauty; Finanzwesen; Essen und Kochen; Spielshow; Gaming; Gesundheit & Fitness; Historische Fiktion; Geschichte; Hobbys & Interessen; Horror; Humor & Comedy; Literatur; Marketing; Psychische Gesundheit; Filme und Fernsehen; Musik; Nachrichten & Politik; Erziehung; Zeitdrama; Philosophie; Reality-TV; Beziehungen; Religion & Spiritualität; Romance; Sci-Fi; Selbsthilfe & Persönlichkeitsentwicklung; Gesellschaft & Kultur; Sportarten; Übernatürlich; Spannung; Talkshow; Technologie; Thriller & Spannung; Reisen; Krieg; Western; Junger Erwachsener; Sonstiges
fi: Lajityyppi: Toiminta ja seikkailu; Animaatio; Anime; Taiteet; Elämäkerta; Liiketoiminta; Lapset; Sarjakuvat ja graafiset romaanit; Rikokset ja mysteerit; Design; Dokumentti; Draama; Koulutus; Perhe; Fantasia; Muoti ja kauneus; Finanssi; Ruoka ja ruoanlaitto; Peliohjelma; Pelit; Terveys ja hyvinvointi; Historiallinen kaunokirjallisuus; Historia; Harrastukset ja kiinnostuksen kohteet; Kauhu; Huumori ja komedia; Kirjallisuus; Markkinointi; Mielenterveys; Elokuvat ja TV; Musiikki; Uutiset ja politiikka; Vanhemmuus; Aikakausidraama; Filosofia; Tosi-TV; Suhteet; Uskonto ja hengellisyys; Romantiikka; Sci-Fi; Itseapu ja henkilökohtainen kehitys; Yhteiskunta ja kulttuuri; Urheilu; Yliluonnollinen; Jännitys; Keskusteluohjelma; Teknologia; Trilleri ja jännitys; Matkailu; Sota; Western; Nuori aikuinen; Muu
ko: 장르: 액션 & 어드벤처; 애니메이션; 일본 애니메이션; 미술; 전기; 사업; 어린이; 만화 & 그래픽 노블; 범죄 & 미스터리; 디자인; 다큐멘터리; 드라마; 교육; 가족; 판타지; 패션 & 뷰티; 재정; 음식 & 요리; 게임 쇼; 게이밍; 건강 & 운동; 역사 소설; 역사; 취미 & 관심 분야; 공포; 유머 & 코미디; 문학; 마케팅; 정신 건강; 영화 & TV; 음악; 뉴스 & 정치; 육아; 시대극; 철학; 리얼리티 TV; 관계; 종교 & 영성; 로맨스; SF; 자조 & 개인 개발; 사회 & 문화; 스포츠; 초자연; 서스펜스; 토크쇼; 기술; 스릴러 & 서스펜스; 여행; 전쟁; 서부; 청소년; 기타
hr-HR: Žanr: Akcija i avantura; Animacija; Anime; Umjetnost; Biografija; Posao; Djeca; Stripovi i grafički romani; Zločin i misterij; Dizajn; Dokumentarni; Drama; Obrazovanje; Obiteljski; Fantazija; Moda i ljepota; Financije; Hrana i kuhanje; Televizijska igra; Gaming; Zdravlje i fitness; Povijesna fikcija; Povijest; Hobiji i interesi; Horor; Humor i komedija; Književnost; Marketing; Mentalno zdravlje; Filmovi i TV; Glazba; Vijesti i politika; Roditeljstvo; Drama razdoblja; Filozofija; Reality TV; Odnosi; Religija i duhovnost; Romantika; Znanstvena fantastika; Samopomoć i osobni razvoj; Društvo i kultura; Sport; Nadnaravno; Napetost; Razgovorna emisija; Tehnologija; Triler i napetost; Putovanje; Rat; Vestern; Mladi odrasli; Ostalo
nb: Sjanger: Action og eventyr; Animasjon; Anime; Kunst; Biografi; Forretninger; Barn; Tegneserier og grafiske noveller; Krim og mystikk; Design; Dokumentar; Drama; Utdanning; Familie; Fantasi; Mote og skjønnhet; Finans; Mat og matlaging; Gameshow; Spill; Helse og fitness; Historiske figurer; Historie; Hobbyer og interesser; Grøsser; Humor og komedie; Litteratur; Markedsføring; Psykisk helse; Filmer og TV; Musikk; Nyheter og politikk; Foreldre; Periodedrama; Filosofi; Reality-TV; Forhold; Religion og spiritualitet; Romanse; Sci-Fi; Selvhjelp og personlig utvikling; Samfunn og kultur; Sport; Overnaturlig; Spenning; Talkshow; Teknologi; Thriller og spenning; Reise; Krig; Western; Unge voksne; Annen
bg-BG: Жанр: Екшън и приключения; Анимация; Аниме; Изкуства; Биография; Бизнес; Деца; Комикси и графични романи; Криминални и мистерии; Дизайн; Документални; Драма; Образование; Семейство; Фантазия; Мода и красота; Финанси; Храна и готвене; Игрално шоу; Гейминг; Здраве и фитнес; Исторически художествени; История; Хобита и интереси; Ужаси; Хумор и комедия; Литература; Маркетинг; Психично здраве; Филми и телевизия; Музика; Новини и политика; Родителство; Историческа драма; Философия; Телевизионно риалити; Връзки; Религия и духовност; Романтика; Научна фантастика; Самопомощ и личностно развитие; Общество и култура; Спорт; Свръхестествени; Съспенс; Токшоу; Технология; Трилър и съспенс; Пътуване; Войни; Уестърн; Млад човек; Други
it: Genere: Azione e avventura; Animazione; Anime; Arti; Biografia; Commerciale; Bambini; Fumetti e romanzi a fumetti; Crime e mistero; Design; Documentario; Drammatico; Educazione; Famiglia; Fantasy; Moda e bellezza; Finanza; Cibo e cucina; Gioco a premi; Giochi; Salute e forma fisica; Romanzo storico; Storia; Hobby e interessi; Horror; Umorismo e commedia; Letteratura; Marketing; Salute mentale; Film e TV; Musica; Notizie e politica; Genitorialità; Sceneggiato storico; Filosofia; Reality; Relazioni; Religione e spiritualità; Romanzo; Sci-Fi; Auto-aiuto e sviluppo personale; Società e cultura; Sport; Soprannaturale; Suspense; Talk show; Tecnologia; Thriller e suspense; Viaggio; Guerra; Western; Giovani adulti; Altro
cs: Žánr: Akce a dobrodružství; Animace; Anime; Umění; Životopis; Podnikatelský; Děti; Komiksy a grafické romány; Kriminální a mysteriózní; Design; Dokument; Drama; Vzdělání; Rodinné; Fantazie; Móda a krása; Finance; Jídlo a vaření; Herní show; Hry; Zdraví a fitness; Historická próza; Historie; Koníčky a zájmy; Horor; Humor a komedie; Literatura; Marketing; Duševní zdraví; Filmy a TV; Hudba; Zprávy a politika; Rodičovství; Dobové drama; Filozofie; Televizní reality show; Vztahy; Náboženství a spiritualita; Romantika; Sci-Fi; Svépomoc a osobní rozvoj; Společnost a kultura; Sporty; Nadpřirozeno; Napětí; Talk show; Technologie; Thriller a napětí; Cestování; Válka; Western; Mladí dospělí; Jiné
tr: Tür: Aksiyon ve macera; Animasyon; Anime; Eserler; Biyografi; İşletme; Çocuklar; Çizgi romanlar ve grafik romanlar; Suç ve gizem; Tasarım; Belgesel; Dram; Eğitim; Aile; Fantezi; Moda ve güzellik; Finans; Yemek ve aşçılık; Oyun programı; Oyun; Sağlık ve fitness; Tarihi kurgu; Tarih; Hobiler ve ilgi alanları; Korku; Mizah ve komedi; Edebiyat; Pazarlama; Ruh sağlığı; Film ve TV; Müzik; Haberler ve politika; Ebeveynlik; Dönem draması; Felsefe; Realite show; İlişkiler; Din ve maneviyat; Romantizm; Bilim kurgu; Kişisel yardım ve kişisel gelişim; Toplum ve kültür; Spor dalları; Doğaüstü; Gerilim; Sohbet programı; Teknoloji; Endişe ve gerilim; Seyahat; Savaş; Batı; Genç yetişkinler; Diğer
lt-LT: Žanras: Veiksmas ir nuotykiai; Animaciniai; Anime; Menai; Biografija; Verslas; Vaikai; Komiksai ir grafiniai romanai; Nusikaltimai ir paslaptys; Dizainas; Dokumentika; Drama; Švietimas; Šeima; Fantastiniai; Mada ir grožis; Finansai; Maistas ir maisto gaminimas; Žaidimų šou; Žaidimai; Sveikata ir fizinis aktyvumas; Istorinė fantastika; Istorija; Hobiai ir pomėgiai; Siaubo; Humoras ir komedija; Literatūra; Rinkodara; Psichinė sveikata; Filmai ir serialai; Muzika; Naujienos ir politika; Vaikų auklėjimas; Istorinė drama; Filosofija; Realybės šou; Santykiai; Religija ir dvasingumas; Romantika; Mokslinė fantastika; Saviugda ir asmeninis tobulėjimas; Visuomenė ir kultūra; Sportas; Antgamtiniai; Įtampa; Pokalbių šou; Technologijos; Trileriai ir įtampa; Kelionės; Karas; Vakarietiški; Jaunuoliai; Kita
zh-TW: 類型: 動作與冒險; 動畫; 日本動畫片; 藝術; 傳記; 商務; 兒童; 漫畫和圖像小說; 犯罪與懸疑; 設計; 紀錄片; 戲劇; 教育; 家庭; 奇幻; 時尚與美容; 金融; 食物與烹飪; 電視遊戲節目; 遊戲; 健康與健身; 歷史片; 記錄; 嗜好與興趣; 恐怖; 幽默與喜劇; 文學; 行銷; 心理健康; 電影與電視節目; 音樂; 新聞與政治; 養育子女; 時代劇; 哲學; 真人秀; 人際關係; 宗教與靈性; 愛情故事; 科幻; 自助與個人發展; 社會與文化; 體育; 靈異; 懸疑; 脫口秀; 科技; 驚悚與懸疑; 旅行; 戰爭; 西方; 青年; 其他
th: ประเภท: การต่อสู้และผจญภัย; แอนิเมชัน; อนิเมะ; ศิลปะ; ชีวประวัติ; ธุรกิจ; เด็กๆ; คอมิกและนิยายภาพ; อาชญากรรมและลึกลับ; ออกแบบ; สารคดี; ดรามา; การศึกษา; ครอบครัว; แฟนตาซี; แฟชั่นและความงาม; การเงิน; อาหารและการปรุงอาหาร; เกมโชว์; การเล่นเกม; สุขภาพและฟิตเนส; นิยายอิงประวัติศาสตร์; ประวัติศาสตร์; งานอดิเรกและสิ่งที่สนใจ; สยองขวัญ; อารมณ์ขันและตลก; วรรณกรรม; การตลาด; สุขภาพจิต; ภาพยนตร์และทีวี; ดนตรี; ข่าวสารและการเมือง; การเลี้ยงดู; ละครย้อนยุค; ปรัชญา; เรียลลิตี้ทีวี; ความสัมพันธ์; ศาสนาและจิตวิญญาณ; โรแมนซ์; ไซไฟ; การพึ่งพาตนเองและการพัฒนาตนเอง; สังคมและวัฒนธรรม; กีฬาต่างๆ; สิ่งเหนือธรรมชาติ; สั่นประสาท; ทอล์กโชว์; เทคโนโลยี; ระทึกขวัญและสั่นประสาท; การท่องเที่ยว; สงคราม; ตะวันตก; วรรณกรรมเยาวชน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Gênero: Ação e aventura; Animação; Anime; Artes; Biografia; Negócios; Infantil; Romances e histórias em quadrinhos; Crime e mistério; Design; Documentário; Drama; Educação; Família; Fantasia; Moda e beleza; Finança; Comida e culinária; Programa de jogos; Jogos; Saúde e bem-estar; Ficção histórica; História; Passatempos e interesses; Terror; Humor e comédia; Literatura; Marketing; Saúde mental; Filmes e TV; Música; Notícias e política; Paternidade; Drama de época; Filosofia; Reality TV; Relacionamentos; Religião e espiritualidade; Romance; Ficção científica; Autoajuda e desenvolvimento pessoal; Sociedade e cultura; Esportes; Sobrenatural; Suspense; Programa de entrevista; Tecnologia; Thriller e suspense; Viagem; Guerra; Velho oeste; Jovem adulto; Outro
hu: Műfaj: Akció és kaland; Animáció; Anime; Művészet; Életrajz; Üzlet; Gyermekek; Képregények és grafikus regények; Krimi és rejtély; Tervezés; Dokumentumfilm; Dráma; Oktatás; Családi; Fantasy; Divat és szépség; Pénzügy; Étel és főzés; Vetélkedő; Játék; Egészség és fitnesz; Történelmi regény; Történelem; Hobbik és érdeklődési körök; Horror; Humor és komédia; Irodalom; Marketing; Mentális egészség; Filmek és TV; Zene; Hírek és politika; Gyermeknevelés; Történelmi dráma; Filozófia; Valóságshow; Kapcsolatok; Vallás és spiritualitás; Románc; Sci-fi; Önsegítés és személyi fejlődés; Társadalom és kultúra; Sport; Természetfölötti; Feszültség; Talkshow; Technológia; Thriller és feszültség; Utazás; Háború; Western; Ifjúsági; Egyéb